Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-608
State Treasurer; deputy; duties; compensation.

The State Treasurer shall have the power to appoint a deputy. The deputy may do and perform, in the absence of the treasurer, all of the acts and duties that he may be authorized to perform by the treasurer, subject to the same restrictions as the treasurer, and the treasurer shall be responsible for all the official acts of his deputy. Such deputy treasurer shall receive a salary of such amount as shall be fixed by the State Treasurer, payable monthly by warrant of the Director of Administrative Services on the State Treasurer.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 24, p. 26;

Laws 1903, c. 102, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1913, § 5583;

Laws 1921, c. 107, § 5, p. 380;

C.S.1922, § 4887;

C.S.1929, § 84-608;

R.S.1943, § 84-608;

Laws 1945, c. 254, § 3, p. 794;

Laws 1947, c. 349, § 1, p. 1096;

Laws 1951, c. 338, § 11, p. 1120;

Laws 1953, c. 358, § 2, p. 1136;

Laws 1957, c. 397, § 1, p. 1362;

Laws 1959, c. 451, § 4, p. 1504;

Laws 1963, c. 536, § 3, p. 1682.

Bonds and oaths, see Chapter 11.

For other provisions as to deputy state treasurer, see Chapter 84, article 8.

Other compensation prohibited, see section 84-723.